Utah statutes.
64-13-6.   Department duties.
(1)  The department shall:
(a)  protect the public through institutional care and confinement, and
supervision in the community of offenders where appropriate;
(b)  implement court-ordered punishment of offenders;
(c)  provide program opportunities for offenders;
(d)  provide treatment for sex offenders who are found to be treatable based
upon criteria developed by the department;
(e)  provide the results of ongoing assessment of sex offenders and objective
diagnostic testing to sentencing and release authorities;
(f)  manage programs that take into account the needs and interests of
victims, where reasonable;
(g)  supervise probationers and parolees as directed by statute and
implemented by the courts and the Board of Pardons and Parole;
(h)  subject to Subsection (2), investigate criminal conduct involving
offenders incarcerated in a state correctional facility;
(i)  cooperate and exchange information with other state, local, and federal
law enforcement agencies to achieve greater success in prevention and
detection of crime and apprehension of criminals; and
(j)  implement the provisions of Section 77-28c-102, Interstate Compact for
Adult Offender Supervision.
(2) (a)  By following the procedures in Subsection (2)(b), the department may
investigate the following occurrences at state correctional facilities:
(i)  criminal conduct of departmental employees;
(ii)  felony crimes resulting in serious bodily injury;
(iii)  death of any person; or
(iv)  aggravated kidnaping.
(b)  Prior to investigating any occurrence specified in Subsection (2)(a), the
department shall:
(i)  notify the sheriff or other appropriate law enforcement agency promptly
after ascertaining facts sufficient to believe an occurrence specified in
Subsection (2)(a) has occurred; and
(ii)  obtain consent of the sheriff or other appropriate law enforcement
agency to conduct an investigation involving an occurrence specified in
Subsection (2)(a).
(3)  Upon request, the department shall provide copies of investigative
reports of criminal conduct to the sheriff or other appropriate law
enforcement agencies.
(4)  The department shall provide data to the Commission on Criminal and
Juvenile Justice to show the criteria for determining sex offender
treatability, the implementation and effectiveness of sex offender treatment,
and the results of ongoing assessment and objective diagnostic testing.  The
Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice will then report these data to the
Judiciary Interim Committee and to the appropriate appropriations subcommittee
annually.
(5)  The Department of Corrections shall collect accounts receivable ordered
by the district court as a result of prosecution for a criminal offense
according to the requirements and during the time periods established in
Subsection 77-18-1(9).
